Utah statutes.
53A-17a-141.   Alternative programs.

(1)  Since the State Board of Education has adopted a policy that requires districts to grant credit for proficiency through alternative programs, school districts are encouraged to continue and expand their cooperation with accredited institutions through performance contracts for educational services, particularly where it is beneficial to students whose progress could be better served through alternative programs.

(2)  School districts are encouraged to participate in programs that focus on increasing the number of ethnic minority and female students in the secondary schools who will go on to study mathematics, engineering, or related sciences at an institution of higher education.



Enacted by Chapter 72, 1991 General Session

